Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 7. Federal Liens

§ 2051.
Filing in town clerk’s office.

Notices of liens upon real or personal property for taxes or other obligations payable to the United States of America, certificates and notices affecting the liens, and certificates discharging the liens shall be filed in the office of the town clerk of the town in this State within which the property subject to the lien is situated.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2052.
Recording of notice of lien.

When a notice of a federal lien is filed, the town clerk shall forthwith record the same in alphabetical order in a book kept for that purpose with the date and hour of filing the lien.
A town clerk shall keep on file in the clerk’s office the notices of these liens.
Liens filed under this section shall be indexed in accordance with

24 V.S.A. § 1153

or 1161.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2053.
Discharge of lien.

When a certificate of discharge of a federal lien is filed in the office of the town clerk, the town clerk shall enter the same, with the date of filing, upon the same page of the record where the notice of the lien is filed, and permanently attach the original certificate of discharge to the original notice of the lien.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.